Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.410

Renewal—Extreme risk protection orders.

The following provisions apply to the renewal of extreme risk protection orders.

(1) The court must notify the petitioner of the impending expiration of an extreme risk protection order. Notice must be received by the petitioner 105 calendar days before the date the order expires.

(2) An intimate partner or family or household member of a respondent, or a law enforcement agency, may by motion request a renewal of an extreme risk protection order at any time within 90 days before the expiration of the order.

(a) Upon receipt of the motion to renew, the court shall order that a hearing be held not later than 14 days from the date the order issues.

(b) In determining whether to renew an extreme risk protection order issued under this section, the court shall consider all relevant evidence presented by the petitioner and follow the same procedure as provided in RCW 7.105.215.

(c) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the requirements for the issuance of an extreme risk protection order as provided in RCW 7.105.215 continue to be met, the court shall renew the order. However, if, after notice, the motion for renewal is uncontested and the petitioner seeks no modification of the order, the order may be renewed on the basis of the petitioner's motion and statement of the reason for the requested renewal.

(d) The renewal of an extreme risk protection order has a duration of one year, subject to termination as provided in RCW 7.105.505 or further renewal by order of the court.

[ 2021 c 215 s 55.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.